District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.57

Other pharmacy-related services.

(a)

Unless otherwise authorized by the Board, an individual who works at a pharmacy and is not licensed or registered by the Board as a pharmacist or pharmacy intern or authorized to perform the services of a pharmacy technician under this chapter, may perform only ancillary pharmacy services, such as:

(1)

Cashiering;

(2)

Bookkeeping;

(3)

Pricing;

(4)

Stocking;

(5)

Delivering;

(6)

Answering nonprofessional telephone inquiries; and

(7)

Documenting third-party reimbursement.

(b)

An individual who is not licensed or registered by the Board as a pharmacist or pharmacy intern or authorized to perform the services of a pharmacy technician under this chapter shall not perform the tasks of a:

(1)

Pharmacist;

(2)

Pharmacy intern;

(3)

Pharmacy technician; or

(4)

Pharmacy technician trainee.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 757
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.